Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Outdoor Recreation.

§ 10.1-206.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 84.

§ 10.1-207.
Cooperation of other departments, etc.

All departments, commissions, boards, agencies, officers, and institutions of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof and park authorities shall cooperate with the Department in the preparation, revision and implementation of a comprehensive plan for the development of outdoor recreational facilities, and such local and detailed plans as may be adopted pursuant thereto. The comprehensive plan shall consider and incorporate, where applicable, wildlife corridors and any recommendation of the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan developed pursuant to § 29.1-579.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-21.3:6; 1988, c. 891; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 498.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 498, effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence.

§ 10.1-208.
Acquisition of property; making property available for agricultural and timbering uses, outdoor and recreational uses.

The Director is authorized to acquire by gift or purchase (i) unrestricted fee simple title to tracts, (ii) fee simple title to such land subject to reservation of farming rights or timber rights or (iii) easements in gross or other interests in real estate as are designed to maintain the character of the land as open-space land. Whenever practicable in the judgment of the Director, real property acquired pursuant to this chapter shall be made available for agricultural and timbering uses which are compatible with the purposes of this chapter.

The Director is authorized to acquire, in the name of the Commonwealth, by gift or purchase, any real property or any interest therein, as the Director deems necessary for obtaining, maintaining, improving, protecting and conserving outdoor areas suitable for the development of a system of outdoor recreational facilities, and to transfer such property to other state agencies as provided in § 2.2-1150.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-21.3:7; 1988, c. 891.